Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.075

Trust not exclusively for charitable purposes—Instrument and information not public—Access.

A trust is not exclusively for charitable purposes, within the meaning of RCW 11.110.040, when the instrument creating it contains a trust for several or mixed purposes, and any one or more of such purposes is not charitable within the meaning of RCW 11.110.020, as enacted or hereafter amended. Such instrument shall be withheld from public inspection by the secretary of state and no information as to such noncharitable purpose shall be made public. The attorney general shall have free access to such information.

[ 1997 c 124 s 4; 1993 c 471 s 30; 1985 c 30 s 120. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 154; 1971 ex.s. c 226 s 5. Formerly RCW 19.10.075.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 471: See RCW 19.09.915.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.